Utah statutes.
72-2-110.   Funds allocated to class B and class C roads -- Matching federal funds -- R.S. 2477 rights.

A county or municipality may:

(1)  use funds which are allocated to class B and class C roads for matching federal funds for the construction of secondary roads now available or which may later become available in accordance with the provisions of law; and

(2)  use up to 30% of the class B and class C roads account funds allocated to the county or municipality to pay the costs of asserting, defending, or litigating local government rights under R.S. 2477 on class B, class C, or class D roads.

